test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_maanu_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - haalu: # ok MAANU
    haalu+N+Sg+Nom:  haaḷu
    haalu+N+Sg+Gen:  haalu
    haalu+N+Sg+Acc:  haalu
    haalu+N+Sg+Ill:  haaḷun
    haalu+N+Sg+Loc:  haalust
    haalu+N+Sg+Com:  haaluin
    haalu+N+Sg+Abe:  haˊluttáá
    haalu+N+Ess:  haallun
    haalu+N+Par:  haallud
    haalu+N+Pl+Nom:  haaluh
    haalu+N+Pl+Gen: [haalui, haˊlui]
    haalu+N+Pl+Acc:  haaluid
    haalu+N+Pl+Ill:  haaluid
    haalu+N+Pl+Loc:  haaluin
    haalu+N+Pl+Com:  haˊluiguin
    haalu+N+Pl+Abe:  haˊluittáá

  Noun - kiilu: # ok MAANU
    kiilu+N+Sg+Nom:  kiiḷu
    kiilu+N+Sg+Gen:  kiilu
    kiilu+N+Sg+Acc:  kiilu
    kiilu+N+Sg+Ill:  kiiḷun
    kiilu+N+Sg+Loc:  kiilust
    kiilu+N+Sg+Com:  kiiluin
    kiilu+N+Sg+Abe:  kiˊluttáá
    kiilu+N+Ess:  kiillun
    kiilu+N+Par:  kiillud
    kiilu+N+Pl+Nom:  kiiluh
    kiilu+N+Pl+Gen:  [kiilui, kiˊlui]
    kiilu+N+Pl+Acc:  kiiluid
    kiilu+N+Pl+Ill:  kiiluid
    kiilu+N+Pl+Loc:  kiiluin
    kiilu+N+Pl+Com:  kiˊluiguin
    kiilu+N+Pl+Abe:  kiˊluittáá

  Noun - piiru: # ok MAANU
    piiru+N+Sg+Nom:  piiru
    piiru+N+Sg+Gen:  piiru
    piiru+N+Sg+Acc:  piiru
    piiru+N+Sg+Ill:  piirun
    piiru+N+Sg+Loc:  piirust
    piiru+N+Sg+Com:  piiruin
    piiru+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊruttáá
    piiru+N+Ess:  piirrun
    piiru+N+Par:  piirrud
    piiru+N+Pl+Nom:  piiruh
    piiru+N+Pl+Gen: [piirui, piˊrui]
    piiru+N+Pl+Acc:  piiruid
    piiru+N+Pl+Ill:  piiruid
    piiru+N+Pl+Loc:  piiruin
    piiru+N+Pl+Com:  piˊruiguin
    piiru+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊruittáá

  Noun - niisu: # ok MAANU
    niisu+N+Sg+Nom:  niisu
    niisu+N+Sg+Gen:  niisu
    niisu+N+Sg+Acc:  niisu
    niisu+N+Sg+Ill:  niisun
    niisu+N+Sg+Loc:  niisust
    niisu+N+Sg+Com:  niisuin
    niisu+N+Sg+Abe:  niˊsuttáá
    niisu+N+Ess:  niissun
    niisu+N+Par:  niissud
    niisu+N+Pl+Nom:  niisuh
    niisu+N+Pl+Gen: [niisui, niˊsui]
    niisu+N+Pl+Acc:  niisuid
    niisu+N+Pl+Ill:  niisuid
    niisu+N+Pl+Loc:  niisuin
    niisu+N+Pl+Com:  niˊsuiguin
    niisu+N+Pl+Abe:  niˊsuittáá

  Noun - máánu: # ok MAANU
    máánu+N+Sg+Nom:  mááṇu
    máánu+N+Sg+Gen:  máánu
    máánu+N+Sg+Acc:  máánu
    máánu+N+Sg+Ill:  mááṇun
    máánu+N+Sg+Loc:  máánust
    máánu+N+Sg+Com:  máánuin
    máánu+N+Sg+Abe:  máˊnuttáá
    máánu+N+Ess:  máánnun
    máánu+N+Par:  máánnud
    máánu+N+Pl+Nom:  máánuh
    máánu+N+Pl+Gen:  [máánui, máˊnui]
    máánu+N+Pl+Acc:  máánuid
    máánu+N+Pl+Ill:  máánuid
    máánu+N+Pl+Loc:  máánuin
    máánu+N+Pl+Com:  máˊnuiguin
    máánu+N+Pl+Abe:  máˊnuittáá
